District of Columbia statutes.
34-2401.21

Notification of violations.

It is the special duty of the Chief of Engineers to bring to the notice of the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia, or to the grand jury, any infraction of § 34-2401.20.

R.S., D.C., § 219
1973 Ed., § 43-1535.
1981 Ed., § 43-1547.